Utah statutes.
63A-12-102.   State archivist -- Duties.

(1)  With the approval of the governor, the executive director of the Department of Administrative Services shall appoint the state archivist to serve as director of the state archives.  The state archivist shall be qualified by archival training, education, and experience.

(2)  The state archivist is charged with custody of the following:

(a)  the enrolled copy of the Utah constitution;

(b)  the acts and resolutions passed by the Legislature;

(c)  all records kept or deposited with the state archivist as provided by law;

(d)  the journals of the Legislature and all bills, resolutions, memorials, petitions, and claims introduced in the Senate or the House of Representatives;

(e)  Indian war records; and

(f)  oaths of office of all state officials.

(3) (a)  The state archivist is the official custodian of all noncurrent records of permanent or historic value that are not required by law to remain in the custody of the originating governmental entity.

(b)  Upon the termination of any governmental entity, its records shall be transferred to the state archives.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

